Arkansas, session 2025, HB1713.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, Section 1 protects the
right of citizens to enact laws and constitutional amendments through the
initiative process and to repeal laws enacted by the General Assembly through
the referendum process;
(2) The State of Arkansas has a compelling interest in:
(A) Preserving and protecting the integrity of the
initiative process and the referendum process; and
(B) Protecting voters from initiatives and referenda that
*SSS111*
03-17-2025 11:22:53 SSS111

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 HB1713
are deficient, confusing, or misleading or that are placed on the ballot by
means of conduct that is:
(i) Misleading;
(ii) Fraudulent;
(iii) Felonious; or
(iv) Otherwise unlawful;
(3) The General Assembly may further these compelling interests
by enacting laws:
(A) Intended to deter and penalize:
(i) Misrepresentation of an issue, measure, or
question; or
(ii) Misrepresentation of the effects of an issue,
measure, or question; and
(B) Of a practical nature to facilitate the initiative and
referendum process; and
(4) Without reasonable and responsible laws and oversight, it
may be possible for promoters of a measure, issue, or question to benefit
from conduct that is:
(A) Misleading;
(B) Fraudulent;
(C) Felonious; or
(D) Otherwise unlawful.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-107, concerning filing an original
draft before circulation of an initiative petition or referendum petition, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(g)(1) The Attorney General shall not certify a proposed ballot title
with a reading level above eighth grade as determined by the Flesch-Kincaid
Grade Level formula as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(2) If the Attorney General rejects a proposed ballot title
under subdivision (g)(1) of this section, the Attorney General shall state
the reasons for rejection and instruct the petitioners to redesign the
proposed ballot title or proposed measure in a manner that does not violate
this subsection.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Retroactivity.
03-17-2025 11:22:53 SSS111

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 HB1713
This act does not apply to a proposed ballot title that has already
been certified by the Attorney General for circulation before the effective
date of this act.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. EMERGENCY CLAUSE.
It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of
Arkansas that it is essential to establish greater clarity and consistency in
the procedures that facilitate initiatives and referenda; that legislation is
needed to ensure a fair, transparent, and uniform approval process for all
measures presented to voters; and that this act is immediately necessary to
preserve the public peace, health, and safety by protecting the rights of
voters through transparency and clarity in the initiative approval process.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Rose













03-17-2025 11:22:53 SSS111